Hawaii statutes.
§291C-95 Overtaking and passing school bus.
(a) Whenever a school bus is stopped on a highway or road in a residential
area with its visual signals actuated as described in subsection (g), the
driver of any motor vehicle on the same highway or road in a residential area
in the lane occupied by the school bus and all lanes adjacent to the lane
occupied by the school bus, regardless of the direction of traffic in those
lanes, shall stop the driver's vehicle not less than twenty feet from the
school bus and shall not proceed until the school bus resumes motion and the
visual signals are turned off.

(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to a
vehicle when the school bus and the vehicle are on different roadways; except
that where a highway or road in a residential area has been divided into two or
more lanes by an intervening space, a physical barrier, or a clearly indicated
dividing section, subsection (a) shall apply to all drivers of motor vehicles
in all lanes on the same side as a school bus which is stopped with visual
signals actuated as required under subsection (c).

(c) The driver of the school bus shall actuate
the visual signals described in subsection (g) only when the school bus is
stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging school children.

(d) The front and rear of every school bus
shall be marked with the words "SCHOOL BUS" in plainly visible
letters not less than eight inches in height and strokes not less than
three-fourths of an inch in width.

(e) No vehicle, other than a school bus, shall
display a "SCHOOL BUS" sign.

(f) When a school bus is being operated upon a
highway for purposes other than as an incident to the transportation of
children, all marking thereon indicating "SCHOOL BUS" shall be
covered or concealed.

(g) The visual signals actuated as required
under subsection (c) shall consist of four red signal lamps meeting the
following requirements:

(1) Two lamps shall face forward and two shall face
the rear;

(2) The two forward lamps shall flash alternately and
shall be mounted at the same level, but as high and as widely spaced as
practical;

(3) The two rear lamps shall flash alternately and
shall be mounted at the same level but as high and as widely spaced as
practical; and

(4) Each of the lamps shall be of sufficient
intensity as to be plainly visible at a distance of five hundred feet in normal
sunlight and shall be capable of being actuated from the driver's seat by a
single switch.

(h) Any person who violates this section shall
be fined not more than $500 or sentenced to perform community service, or both.
[L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 22, §2; am L 1976, c 52, §1; gen ch
1985; am L 1987, c 237, §2; am L 1998, c 265, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next